Maine, session 132, LD540.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3028-A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 335, §1, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§3028-A. Disposal of unidentified human remains and abandoned human remains;
identification
This section governs the storage, identification, disposition and expenses related to
human remains.
1. Storage and disposition of human remains. Whenever unidentified human
remains are recovered, the Chief Medical Examiner may store the remains, release them to
an educational institution, inter them in an appropriate resting place or have them cremated
in accordance with this section. Ashes of remains cremated may be disposed of in any
appropriate manner. Human remains uncovered in a cared-for cemetery are excluded from
the operation of this section. Human remains known to be Indian remains are excluded
from the operation of this subsection and must be handled in the manner required by section
2842-B.
The Chief Medical Examiner may assume responsibility for the disposal of identified
human remains of a deceased resident of this State that are the subject of a medical
examiner case if no one takes custody and control of the human remains for a period of 30
days after the Chief Medical Examiner has completed an autopsy or necessary examination
of the human remains, made reasonable inquiry under section 3028‑D, subsection 1 and
satisfied the requirements of subsection 2. Such abandoned remains may be interred or
cremated. The Chief Medical Examiner shall file or cause to be filed a certificate of
abandonment in the municipality where the human remains were recovered that indicates
the means of disposal.
In the absence of a responsible party, payment of expenses incurred by the Chief Medical
Examiner pursuant to this section must be made pursuant to section 3028‑D, subsection 2
as if the remains were unidentified. The Chief Medical Examiner may seek to recover costs
from the estate or municipality of residence of the deceased.
2. Identification of human remains using DNA. After the Chief Medical Examiner
has had possession of unidentified human remains for 45 days, the Chief Medical Examiner
shall test the deoxyribonucleic acid, or DNA, of the unidentified human remains using
forensic genetic genealogy testing. For purposes of this subsection, "forensic genetic
genealogy testing" means a DNA analysis of a sample of biological material by a laboratory
to develop a profile and search for that profile in a database of personal genomics or using
a direct-to-consumer genetic genealogy service.
Sec. 2. Chief Medical Examiner to identify human remains. The Chief
Medical Examiner shall use forensic genetic genealogy testing of the deoxyribonucleic
acid, or DNA, of unidentified human remains in order of importance as determined by the
Chief Medical Examiner to identify any unidentified human remains in the possession of
the Chief Medical Examiner as of the effective date of this Act. As used in this section,
"forensic genetic genealogy testing" has the same meaning as in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 3028-A, subsection 2.
Page 1 - 132LR1632(01)